New York, session 2025-2026, A4619.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1180 of the tax law is amended by adding three new 2 subdivisions (c), (d) and (e) to read as follows: 3 (c) "Flavored vapor product" shall have the same meaning as described 4 in section thirteen hundred ninety-nine-mm-1 of the public health law. 5 (d) "Vapor products distributor" means any person who imports or caus- 6 es to be imported into this state any vapor products for sale, or who 7 sells vapor products to a vapor products dealer or other persons for the 8 purposes of resale, or who manufactures any vapor product in this state, 9 and any person within or without the state who is authorized by the 10 commissioner to make returns and pay the tax on vapor products sold, 11 shipped, or delivered by such person to any person in the state. 12 (e) "Wholesale price" means the price at which a vapor products dealer 13 purchases vapor products from a vapor products distributor. 14 § 2. Section 1181 of the tax law, as amended by chapter 92 of the laws 15 of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 16 § 1181. Imposition of tax. (a) In addition to any other tax imposed 17 by this chapter or other law, there is hereby imposed a tax [of twenty EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06080-08-6 A. 4619--B 2 1 percent on receipts from the retail sale of vapor products sold in this 2 state. The tax is imposed on the purchaser and collected by the vapor 3 products dealer as defined in subdivision (b) of section eleven hundred 4 eighty of this article, in trust for and on account of the state. The 5 taxes imposed under this section shall not apply to adult-use cannabis 6 products subject to tax under article twenty-C of this chapter] on vapor 7 products at the following rates: on vapor products that are prefilled, 8 sealed by the manufacturer, and not intended to be refilled, thirty-two 9 cents per milliliter of the noncombustible liquid or gel contained ther- 10 ein; and for any other vapor products, eight percent on the wholesale 11 price of vapor products sold by a vapor products distributor to a vapor 12 products dealer in this state. The tax is imposed on the vapor products 13 dealer and collected by the vapor products distributor, in trust for and 14 on account of the state. The taxes imposed under this section shall not 15 apply to adult-use cannabis products subject to tax under article twen- 16 ty-C of this chapter. Such tax on vapor products is intended to be 17 imposed only once upon the sale of any vapor products. 18 (b) The vapor products distributor shall be liable for the payment of 19 the tax on vapor products which the vapor products distributor imports 20 or causes to be imported into the state, or which the vapor products 21 distributor sells to a vapor products dealer or other persons for 22 purposes of resale in this state, or which the vapor products distribu- 23 tor manufactures in the state, and every vapor products distributor 24 authorized by the commissioner to make returns and pay the tax on tobac- 25 co products sold, shipped or delivered by the vapor products distributor 26 to any person in the state shall be liable for the payment of the tax on 27 all vapor products sold, shipped or delivered. 28 (c) Every vapor products dealer shall be liable for the tax on all 29 vapor products in the vapor products distributor's possession at any 30 time, upon which tax has not been paid or assumed by a vapor products 31 distributor appointed by the commissioner, and the failure of any vapor 32 products dealer to produce and exhibit to the commissioner or the 33 commissioner's authorized representative upon demand, an invoice by a 34 vapor products distributor for any vapor products in the vapor products 35 distributor's possession shall be presumptive evidence that the tax 36 thereon has not been paid, and that such dealer is liable for the tax 37 thereon unless evidence of such invoice, payment or assumption shall 38 later be produced. 39 § 3. The tax law is amended by adding two new sections 1183-a and 40 1183-b to read as follows: 41 § 1183-a. Vapor products distributor license and renewal. (a) Every 42 person who intends to be a vapor products distributor in this state must 43 receive from the commissioner a license prior to engaging in business. 44 In addition to the requirements of section eleven hundred eighty-three 45 of this article, a vapor products dealer who purchases or receives vapor 46 products from a manufacturer or out-of-state distributor shall be 47 required to obtain a vapor products distributor license. The applicant 48 for a vapor products distributor license must electronically submit a 49 properly completed application for a license for each location at which 50 the business shall be conducted in this state, on a form prescribed by 51 the commissioner, and shall be accompanied by a non-refundable applica- 52 tion fee of three hundred dollars. 53 (b) A vapor products distributor license shall be valid for the calen- 54 dar year for which it is issued unless earlier suspended or revoked. 55 Upon the expiration of the term stated on the license, such license 56 shall be null and void. A license shall not be assignable or transfera- A. 4619--B 3 1 ble and shall be destroyed immediately upon the vapor products distribu- 2 tor ceasing to do business as specified in such license or in the event 3 that such business never commenced. 4 (c) Every vapor products distributor shall publicly display in the 5 vapor products distributor's place of business a license from the 6 department. 7 (d) (1) The commissioner shall refuse to issue a license to any appli- 8 cant who does not possess a valid certificate of authority under section 9 eleven hundred thirty-four of this chapter. In addition, the commission- 10 er may refuse to issue a license, or suspend, cancel or revoke a license 11 issued to any person who: 12 (A) has a past-due liability as that term is defined in section one 13 hundred seventy-one-v of this chapter; 14 (B) has had a license under this article or any license or registra- 15 tion provided for in this chapter revoked within one year from the date 16 on which such application was filed; 17 (C) has been convicted of a crime provided for in this chapter within 18 one year from the date on which such application was filed; 19 (D) willfully fails to file a report or return required by this arti- 20 cle; 21 (E) willfully files, causes to be filed, gives or causes to be given a 22 report, return, certificate or affidavit required by this article which 23 is false; 24 (F) willfully fails to collect or truthfully account for or pay over 25 any tax imposed by this article; or 26 (G) whose place of business is at the same premises as that of a 27 person whose vapor products distributor license has been revoked and 28 where such revocation is still in effect, unless the applicant or vapor 29 products distributor provides the commissioner with adequate documenta- 30 tion demonstrating that such applicant or vapor products distributor 31 acquired the premises or business through an arm's length transaction as 32 defined in paragraph (e) of subdivision one of section four hundred 33 eighty-a of this chapter. 34 (2) In addition to the grounds provided in paragraph one of this 35 subdivision, the commissioner shall refuse to issue a license and shall 36 cancel or suspend a license as directed by an enforcement officer pursu- 37 ant to article thirteen-F of the public health law. Notwithstanding any 38 provision of law to the contrary, an applicant whose application for a 39 license is refused or a vapor products distributor whose license is 40 cancelled or suspended under this paragraph shall have no right to a 41 hearing under this chapter and shall have no right to commence a court 42 action or proceeding or to any other legal recourse against the commis- 43 sioner with respect to such refusal, suspension or cancellation; 44 provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to deny a 45 vapor products distributor a hearing under article thirteen-F of the 46 public health law or to prohibit vapor products distributors from 47 commencing a court action or proceeding against an enforcement officer 48 as defined in section thirteen hundred ninety-nine-aa of the public 49 health law. 50 (e) If a vapor products distributor license is suspended, cancelled or 51 revoked and such vapor products distributor distributes or sells vapor 52 products through more than one place of business in this state, the 53 vapor products distributor's license issued to that place of business 54 where such violation occurred shall be suspended, revoked, or cancelled. 55 Provided, however, upon a vapor products distributor's third suspension, 56 cancellation, or revocation within a five-year period for any one or A. 4619--B 4 1 more businesses owned or operated by the vapor products distributor, 2 such suspension, cancellation, or revocation of the vapor products 3 distributor's license shall apply to all places of business where the 4 vapor products distributor distributes or sells vapor products in this 5 state. 6 (f) Every holder of a license must notify the commissioner of changes 7 to any of the information stated on the license or changes to any infor- 8 mation contained in the application for the license. Such notification 9 must be made on or before the last day of the month in which a change 10 occurs and must be made electronically on a form prescribed by the 11 commissioner. 12 (g) Every vapor products distributor who holds a license under this 13 article shall be required to reapply for a license for the following 14 calendar year on or before the twentieth day of September and such reap- 15 plication shall be subject to the same requirements and conditions, 16 including grounds for refusal, as an initial license under this article, 17 including but not limited to the payment of the three hundred dollar 18 application fee for each business location. 19 (h) In addition to any other penalty imposed by this chapter, any 20 vapor products distributor who violates the provisions of this section, 21 (1) for a first violation is liable for a civil fine not less than five 22 thousand dollars but not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars and such 23 license may be suspended for a period of not more than six months; and 24 (2) for a second or subsequent violation within three years following a 25 prior violation of this section, is liable for a civil fine not less 26 than ten thousand dollars but not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars 27 and such license may be suspended for a period of up to thirty-six 28 months; or (3) for a third violation within a period of five years, the 29 license issued to each place of business owned or operated by the vapor 30 products distributor in this state shall be revoked for a period of up 31 to five years. 32 § 1183-b. Restrictions on sale and storage. (a) No person, including a 33 vapor products dealer or any agent or employee of a vapor products deal- 34 er, shall sell or offer for sale at retail in the state or to any person 35 in the state any flavored vapor product. 36 (b) No vapor products distributor or any agent or employee of a vapor 37 products distributor acting in the capacity thereof, shall sell, proc- 38 ess, package, ship or distribute flavored vapor products to a vapor 39 products dealer or seller, or any agent or employee of a vapor products 40 dealer or seller acting in the capacity thereof, located in the state. 41 Nothing in this section shall prevent a vapor products distributor or 42 any agent or employee of a vapor products distributor acting in the 43 capacity thereof, from selling, processing, packaging, shipping or 44 distributing flavored vapor products to out-of-state retailers. 45 (c) No vapor products dealer, seller or distributor or any agent or 46 employee of a vapor products dealer, seller, or distributor acting in 47 the capacity thereof, shall keep in inventory, store, stow, warehouse, 48 process, package, ship, or distribute flavored vapor products anywhere 49 in, adjacent to, or accessible to a place of business or premises where 50 vapor products are sold, offered for sale, exchanged, or offered for 51 exchange, for any form of consideration, at retail. 52 § 4. Section 1184 of the tax law, as added by section 1 of part UU of 53 chapter 59 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 54 § 1184. Administrative provisions. (a) [Except as otherwise provided 55 for in this article, the taxes imposed by this article shall be adminis- 56 tered and collected in a like manner as and jointly with the taxes A. 4619--B 5 1 imposed by sections eleven hundred five and eleven hundred ten of this 2 chapter. In addition, except as otherwise provided in this article, all 3 of the provisions of article twenty-eight of this chapter (except 4 sections eleven hundred seven, eleven hundred eight, eleven hundred 5 nine, and eleven hundred forty-eight) relating to or applicable to the 6 administration, collection and review of the taxes imposed by such 7 sections eleven hundred five and eleven hundred ten, including, but not 8 limited to, the provisions relating to definitions, returns, exemptions, 9 penalties, tax secrecy, personal liability for the tax, and collection 10 of tax from the customer, shall apply to the taxes imposed by this arti- 11 cle so far as such provisions can be made applicable to the taxes 12 imposed by this article with such limitations as set forth in this arti- 13 cle and such modifications as may be necessary in order to adapt such 14 language to the taxes so imposed. Such provisions shall apply with the 15 same force and effect as if the language of those provisions had been 16 set forth in full in this article except to the extent that any 17 provision is either inconsistent with a provision of this article or is 18 not relevant to the taxes imposed by this article. 19 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (a) of this section, 20 the exemptions provided in paragraph ten of subdivision (a) of section 21 eleven hundred fifteen of this chapter, and the provisions of section 22 eleven hundred sixteen, except those provided in paragraphs one, two, 23 three and six of subdivision (a) of such section, shall not apply to the 24 taxes imposed by this article.] Every vapor products distributor author- 25 ized by the commissioner to make returns and pay the tax on vapor 26 products sold, shipped, or delivered by the vapor products distributor 27 to a person in the state shall file a return showing the quantity and 28 wholesale price of all vapor products so sold, shipped, or delivered 29 during the preceding calendar month. Provided, however, the commissioner 30 may, if the commissioner deems it necessary in order to ensure the 31 payment of the taxes imposed by this article, require returns to be made 32 at such times and covering such periods as the commissioner may deem 33 necessary, and, by regulation, may permit the filing of returns on a 34 quarterly, semi-annual or annual basis, or may waive the filing of 35 returns by a vapor products distributor for such time and upon such 36 terms as the commissioner may deem proper if satisfied that no tax 37 imposed by this article is or will be payable during the time for which 38 returns are waived. Such returns shall contain such further information 39 as the commissioner may require. 40 (b) Every vapor product distributor shall pay to the commissioner with 41 the filing of such return the tax on vapor products for such month 42 imposed under this article, less two percent, to cover the distributor's 43 expense in the collection and remittance of the said tax. 44 (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or section eleven 45 hundred forty-six of this chapter, the commissioner may, in [his or her] 46 the commissioner's discretion, permit the commissioner of health or [his 47 or her] such commissioner's authorized representative to inspect any 48 return related to the tax imposed by this article and may furnish to the 49 commissioner of health any such return or supply [him or her] such 50 commissioner with information concerning an item contained in any such 51 return, or disclosed by any investigation of a liability under this 52 article. 53 § 5. The tax law is amended by adding three new sections 1184-a, 54 1184-b and 1184-c to read as follows: 55 § 1184-a. Enforcement. (a) The commissioner or the commissioner's duly 56 authorized representatives are hereby authorized: A. 4619--B 6 1 (1) To enforce the provisions in this article and the provisions in 2 section thirteen hundred ninety-nine-mm-1 of the public health law 3 concerning flavored vapor products. 4 (2) To conduct regulatory inspections during normal business hours of 5 any place of business, including a vehicle used for such business, where 6 vapor products are distributed, placed, stored, sold, or offered for 7 sale. For the purposes of this section, "place of business" shall not 8 include a residence or other real property, or any personal vehicle on 9 or about such property, not held out as open to the public or otherwise 10 being utilized in a business or commercial manner, unless probable cause 11 exists to believe that such residence, real property or vehicle is being 12 used in such a business or commercial manner for the buying or selling 13 of vapor products. 14 (3) To examine any vapor products and the books, papers, invoices, and 15 other records of any place of business or vehicle where vapor products 16 are distributed, placed, stored, sold or offered for sale. Any person in 17 possession, control or occupancy of any such business is required to 18 give to the commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized represen- 19 tatives, the means, facilities, and opportunity for such examinations. 20 For the purposes of this section, "place of business" shall not include 21 a residence or other real property, or any personal vehicle on or about 22 such property, not held out as open to the public or otherwise being 23 utilized in a business or commercial manner, unless probable cause 24 exists to believe that such residence, real property or vehicle is being 25 used in such a business or commercial manner for the buying or selling 26 of vapor products. 27 (b) If any person registered or who has obtained a license under this 28 article, or their agents, refuses to give the commissioner, or the 29 commissioner's duly authorized representatives, the means, facilities 30 and opportunity for the inspections and examinations required by this 31 section, the commissioner, after notice and an opportunity for a hear- 32 ing, may revoke their license to distribute vapor products or to sell 33 vapor products at retail: 34 (1) for a period of one year for the first such failure; 35 (2) for a period of up to three years for a second such failure within 36 a period of three years; and 37 (3) for a period of up to seven years for a third such failure within 38 five years. 39 (c) The commissioner or the commissioner's duly authorized represen- 40 tatives shall seize any non-tax-paid vapor products or flavored vapor 41 products, found in any place of business or vehicle where vapor products 42 are distributed, placed, stored, sold or offered for sale by any person 43 who does not possess a license as described in section eleven hundred 44 eighty-three-a of this article. 45 (d) All non-tax-paid vapor products or flavored vapor products seized 46 pursuant to the authority of this chapter or any other law of this state 47 shall be turned over to the department or its authorized representative. 48 Such seized non-tax-paid vapor products shall, after notice and an 49 opportunity for a hearing, be forfeited to the state. If the department 50 determines the non-tax-paid vapor products cannot be used for law 51 enforcement purposes, it may, within a reasonable time after the forfei- 52 ture of such non-tax-paid vapor products, upon publication in the state 53 registry, destroy such forfeited non-tax-paid vapor products. 54 (e) Whenever a police officer designated in section 1.20 of the crimi- 55 nal procedure law or a peace officer designated in subdivision four of 56 section 2.10 of such law, acting pursuant to such officer's special A. 4619--B 7 1 duties, shall discover any flavored vapor products offered for retail 2 sale in violation of the provisions in section thirteen hundred ninety- 3 nine-mm-1 of the public health law or section eleven hundred eighty- 4 three-b of this article, respectively, such police officer or peace 5 officer is hereby authorized and empowered forthwith to seize and take 6 possession of such flavored vapor products. Such flavored vapor 7 products seized by a police officer or peace officer shall be turned 8 over to the commissioner. Such seized flavored vapor products or 9 flavored nicotine analogue products shall be forfeited to the state. If 10 the department determines the vapor products cannot be used for law 11 enforcement purposes, it may, within a reasonable time after the forfei- 12 ture of such vapor products, destroy such forfeited vapor products. 13 § 1184-b. General powers of the tax commission. The powers conferred 14 upon the tax commission by sections one hundred seventy-one and one 15 hundred seventy-one-b of this chapter shall, so far as applicable, be 16 exercisable with respect to the provisions of this article. Such commis- 17 sion may require returns to be filed with it at such times and contain- 18 ing such information as it may prescribe and in such event the fact that 19 a person's name is signed to the return shall be prima facie evidence 20 for all purposes that the return was actually signed by such person. 21 Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the tax commission 22 may enter into an agreement with any city of this state which is author- 23 ized to impose a tax similar to that imposed by this article to provide 24 for the joint administration, in whole or in part, of such taxes. 25 § 1184-c. Directory of vapor products. (a) The commissioner shall 26 establish and maintain on the commissioner's internet website a directo- 27 ry of vapor products that may be sold in this state. 28 (b) Every manufacturer and every importer of vapor products shall 29 submit to the commissioner a list of all vapor products that they manu- 30 facture or import for retail sale or for sale to a consumer in this 31 state. Any submission under this section shall be accompanied by a 32 certification by the manufacturer or importer, under penalty of perjury, 33 that does all of the following: 34 (1) separately lists each brand name, product name, category (e.g., 35 disposable vapor product, power unit, device, e-liquid cartridge, e-li- 36 quid pod); 37 (2) describes for each vapor product if a formal authorization, 38 approval, or order from the United States Food and Drug Administration 39 under Section 387e(j) or 387j of the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic 40 Act (FFDCA) (21 U.S.C. Sec. 301 et seq.) has been sought and, if so, the 41 status of any request for that authorization, approval, or order; and 42 (3) certifies that each vapor product is not a flavored vapor product 43 or is a flavored vapor product that the U.S. Food and Drug Adminis- 44 tration has authorized to legally market as defined under 21 U.S.C. § 45 387j and that has received a premarket review approval order under 21 46 U.S.C. § 387j(c) et seq. 47 (c) (1) Upon the request of the commissioner, a manufacturer or 48 importer shall provide additional information and factual substantiation 49 to confirm a vapor product is not a flavored vapor product, or informa- 50 tion and documentation regarding the vapor product's packaging, label- 51 ing, and marketing authorization status. 52 (2) Information submitted to the commissioner by a manufacturer or 53 importer pursuant to this subparagraph and designated as nonpublic shall 54 be deemed exempt from public disclosure under section eighty-seven of 55 the public officers law. A. 4619--B 8 1 (d) The commissioner shall decline to include in, or may remove from, 2 the directory any vapor product that the commissioner reasonably deter- 3 mines is a flavored vapor product that lacks a premarket review approval 4 order under 21 U.S.C. § 387j(c) et seq. 5 (e) (1) The commissioner may not remove a vapor product from the 6 directory until at least thirty days after the manufacturer or importer 7 has been given notice of an intended action setting forth the reasons 8 therefor. Notice shall be sufficient and be deemed immediately received 9 by a manufacturer or importer if the notice is sent either electron- 10 ically or by facsimile to an electronic mail address or facsimile 11 number, as the case may be, provided by the manufacturer or importer in 12 its most recent certification filed under this section. 13 (2) The vapor product manufacturer shall have fifteen days from the 14 date of service of the notice of the commissioner's intended action to 15 cure the deficiencies or otherwise establish that the vapor product 16 manufacturer or its products should be included in the directory. 17 (3) Retailers shall have thirty days following the removal of a vapor 18 product from the directory to sell such products that were in the 19 retailer's inventory as of the date of removal. 20 (4) After thirty days following removal from the directory, the vapor 21 products identified in the notice of removal and intended for sale in 22 this state or to a consumer in this state are subject to seizure from 23 retailers, distributors, and wholesalers, forfeiture, and destruction or 24 disposal, including by contracting with a licensed hazardous waste 25 disposal facility, and may not be purchased or sold for retail sale or 26 to a consumer in this state. The cost of such seizure, forfeiture, and 27 destruction or disposal shall be borne by the person from whom the 28 products are confiscated. 29 (f) Every manufacturer and every importer that has made a submission 30 under this section shall submit updated information to the commissioner 31 whenever it no longer manufactures or imports for sale or distribution 32 in or into the state a vapor product listed in the directory or when 33 there has been a material change to the vapor product, including as to 34 marketing authorization status or flavor. 35 (g) Every manufacturer or importer that submits a brand style pursuant 36 to this section shall also do all of the following: 37 (1) Consent to the jurisdiction of the courts of this state for the 38 purpose of enforcement of this section and for enforcement of regu- 39 lations adopted pursuant to this section. 40 (2) Appoint a registered agent for service of process in this state. 41 (3) Identify the registered agent to the commissioner. 42 (4) Waive any sovereign immunity defense that may apply in an action 43 to enforce this section or to enforce regulations adopted pursuant to 44 this section. 45 (h) (1) Every manufacturer and importer submission under this section 46 shall be accompanied by an initial application fee of one thousand 47 dollars per vapor product, and thereafter an annual renewal fee of five 48 hundred dollars per vapor product. 49 (2) Application and renewal fees received under this section shall be 50 used for the administration and enforcement of this section, including 51 but not limited to contracting with a licensed hazardous waste disposal 52 facility as needed. 53 (i) The commissioner shall publish the vapor product directory by 54 December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six. 55 (j) After sixty days following initial publication of the directory, 56 vapor products not listed in the directory and intended for sale in this A. 4619--B 9 1 state or to a consumer in this state are subject to seizure, forfeiture, 2 and destruction or disposal, and may not be purchased or sold for retail 3 sale or to a consumer in this state. The cost of such seizure, forfei- 4 ture, and destruction or disposal shall be borne by the person from whom 5 the products are confiscated. 6 (k) The following penalties shall apply to violations of this section: 7 (1) (i) A retailer, distributor, wholesaler, or importer who sells or 8 offers for sale a vapor product for retail sale or to a consumer in this 9 state that is not included in the directory shall be subject to a civil 10 penalty of five hundred dollars for each individual vapor product 11 offered for sale in violation of this section; 12 (ii) for a second violation of this type within a twelve-month period, 13 the civil penalty shall be at least seven hundred fifty dollars but not 14 more than one thousand dollars per product and a licensee's license 15 shall be suspended for thirty days; and 16 (iii) for a third violation of this type within a twelve-month period, 17 the civil penalty shall be at least one thousand dollars but not more 18 than one thousand five hundred dollars per product and a licensee's 19 license shall be revoked. 20 (2) A manufacturer whose vapor products are not listed in the directo- 21 ry and who causes the products that are not listed to be sold for retail 22 sale in this state or to a consumer in this state, whether directly or 23 through an importer, distributor, wholesaler, retailer, or similar 24 intermediary or intermediaries, is subject to a civil penalty of ten 25 thousand dollars for each individual vapor product offered for sale in 26 violation of this section. In addition, any manufacturer that falsely 27 represents any information required by a certification form shall be 28 guilty of a class B misdemeanor for each false representation. 29 (3) In an action to enforce this act, the state shall be entitled to 30 recover costs, including the costs of investigation, expert witness fees 31 and reasonable attorney fees. 32 (4) A second or subsequent violation of this section is a deceptive 33 trade practice under section three hundred forty-nine of the general 34 business law. 35 (m) The commissioner may adopt rules and regulations necessary to 36 implement the purposes of this section. 37 § 6. This act shall take effect immediately.